Hawaii, session 2026, HB2381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302D-     Teacher national board certification incentive program.  (a) There is established within the commission the teacher national board certification incentive program to recognize and support exemplary teaching practice by supporting public charter school teachers who have achieved national board certification under the certification program of the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards.  The teacher national board certification incentive program shall provide: (1)  A $5,000 bonus per year for each public charter school teacher who maintains current national board certification; (2)  A $1,500 bonus upon completing all components of the certification program of the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards; (3)  A reimbursement of the remainder of the national board certification application fee upon achievement of national board certification; and (4)  An additional $5,000 bonus per year for each public charter school teacher who maintains current national board certification and who teaches at: (A)  A school in a focus, priority, or other similar designation, as determined by the commission; (B)  A school with a high turnover rate, as determined by the commission; or (C)  A hard-to-fill school, as determined by the commission. (b)  The incentive program shall include a mentoring component that encourages and enables national board-certified teachers to assist other teachers and share their teaching expertise." SECTION 2.  Section 302D-28, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a)  Beginning with fiscal year [2012-2013,] 2026-2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, the non-facility general fund per‑pupil funding request for charter school students shall be the same as the general fund per-pupil amount to the department in the most recently approved executive budget recommendation for the department and shall be based upon reasonable projected enrollment figures for all charter schools.  The general fund per-pupil request for each regular education and special education student shall: (1)  Include all general fund regular education cost categories, including comprehensive school support services, but excluding special education services, adult education, and the after-school plus program; provided that these services are provided and funded by the department; and (2)  Exclude [fringe]: (A)  Fringe benefit costs [and debt]; (B)  Amounts provided to charter school teachers under section 302D-    and other teacher differentials approved by the department and implemented by public charter schools; and (C)  Debt service. (b) [Fringe benefit costs] Costs under subsection (a)(2)(A) for charter school employees, regardless of the payroll system utilized by a charter school, shall be included in the department of budget and finance's annual budget request.  Costs under subsection (a)(2)(B) shall be included in the state public charter school commission's annual budget request.  No [fringe benefit] costs under subsections (a)(2)(A) or (B) shall be charged directly to or deducted from the charter school per‑pupil allocations. The legislature shall make an appropriation based upon the budget request; provided that the legislature may make additional appropriations for facility and other costs. The governor, pursuant to chapter 37, may impose restrictions or reductions on charter school appropriations similar to those imposed on department schools." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.